Washington statutes.
RCW 35.01.040

Town.

A town has a population of less than fifteen hundred at the time of its organization and does not operate under Title 35A RCW.

[ 1997 c 361 s 10; 1994 c 81 s 5; 1965 c 7 s 35.01.040. Prior: 1963 c 119 s 2; 1955 c 319 s 5; prior: (i) 1890 p 140 s 11, part; RRS s 8932, part. (ii) 1890 p 141 s 13; RRS s 8934.]